California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) (1) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, any drug which is approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for use in the treatment of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS) or an AIDS-related condition shall be deemed to be approved for addition to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs only for the purpose of treating AIDS or an AIDS-related condition, for
 the period prior to the completion of the procedures established pursuant to Section 14105.33.

(2) In addition to any drug that is deemed to be approved pursuant to paragraph (1), any drug that meets any of the following criteria shall be a Medi-Cal benefit, subject to utilization controls:

(A) Any vaccine to protect against human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection.

(B) Any antiviral agent, immune modulator, or other agent to be administered to persons who have been infected with human immunodeficiency virus to counteract the effects of that infection.

(C) Any drug or biologic used to treat opportunistic infections associated with acquired immune deficiency syndrome, that have been found to be medically accepted indications and that has either been
 approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration or recognized for that use in a compendia listed in Section 1927 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8).

(D) Any drug or biologic used to treat the chemotherapy-induced suppression of the human immune system resulting from the treatment of acquired immune deficiency syndrome.

(3) The department shall add any drug deemed to be approved pursuant to paragraph (1) to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs or allow the provision of the drug as a Medi-Cal benefit, subject to utilization controls, pursuant to paragraph (2), only if the manufacturer of the drug has executed a contract with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services which provides for rebates in accordance with Section 1396r-8 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) Any drug deemed
 to be approved pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be immediately added to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs, and shall be exempt from the contract requirements of Section 14105.33.

(c) If it is determined pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14105.39 that a drug to which subdivision (a) applies should not be placed on the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs, that drug shall no longer be deemed to be approved for addition to the list of contract drugs pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 479, Sec. 5.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.435.

(a) Within 60 days of the approval of a drug in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 14105.43, the department shall assign to that drug a reimbursement code, and provide notice to providers that the drug is on the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs.

(b) In the event that a manufacturer has not notified the department in writing of the approval of a drug by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS) or an
 AIDS-related condition within 15 days of that approval, the department shall be granted an additional 30 days to comply with subdivision (a). Written notification from the drug manufacturer shall include a copy of the United States Food and Drug Administration approval letter and the official labeling for the drug.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 949, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.436.

(a) Effective July 1, 2002, all pharmaceutical manufacturers shall provide to the department a state rebate, in addition to rebates pursuant to other provisions of state or federal law, for any drug products that have been added to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs pursuant to Section 14105.43 or 14133.2 and reimbursed through the Medi-Cal outpatient fee-for-service drug program. The state rebate shall be negotiated as necessary between the department and the pharmaceutical manufacturer. The negotiations shall take into account offers such as rebates, discounts, disease management programs, and other cost savings offerings and shall be retroactive to July 1, 2002.

(b) The department may use existing administrative mechanisms for any
 drug for which the department does not obtain a rebate pursuant to subdivision (a). The department may only use those mechanisms in the event that, by February 1, 2003, the manufacturer refuses to provide the additional rebate. This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2010.

(c) For purposes of this section, “Medi-Cal utilization data” means the data used by the department to reimburse providers under all programs that qualify for federal drug rebates pursuant to Section 1927 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8) or that otherwise qualify for federal funds under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) pursuant to the Medicaid state plan or waivers. Medi-Cal utilization data excludes data from covered entities identified in Section 256b(a)(4) of Title 42 of the United States Code in accordance with Sections 256b(a)(5)(A) and 1396r-8(a)(5)(C) of Title 42 of the United States
 Code, and those capitated plans that include a prescription drug benefit in the capitated rate and that have negotiated contracts for rebates or discounts with manufacturers.

(d) Upon implementation of paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 14105.33 for drugs pursuant to this section, subdivisions (a) and (c) shall become inoperative and “utilization data” shall be described pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14105.33. The department shall post on its internet website a notice that it has implemented paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 14105.33 for drugs pursuant to this section.

(e) Effective January 1, 2026, all pharmaceutical manufacturers renewing or entering new state rebate agreements shall provide to the department a state rebate, in addition to rebates pursuant to other provisions of state or federal law, in the following amounts based on
 Medi-Cal utilization data for any drug products that have been added to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs pursuant to Section 14105.43 or 14133.2:

(1) An amount not less than 20 percent of the average manufacturer price if the federal rebate is less than 50 percent of the average manufacturer price.

(2) An amount not less than 15 percent of the average manufacturer price if the federal rebate is 50 percent or greater of the average manufacturer price.

(f) Pharmaceutical manufacturers shall, by January 1, 2010, enter into a supplemental rebate agreement for the rebate required in subdivision (e) for drug products added to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs on or before December 31, 2009.

(g) Effective January 1, 2010, all pharmaceutical manufacturers
 who have not entered into a supplemental rebate agreement pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f) shall provide to the department a state rebate, in addition to rebates pursuant to other provisions of state or federal law, equal to an amount not less than 20 percent of the average manufacturer price based on Medi-Cal utilization data for any drug products that have been added to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs pursuant to Section 14105.43 or 14133.2 prior to January 1, 2010. If the pharmaceutical manufacturer does not enter into a supplemental rebate agreement by March 1, 2010, the manufacturer’s drug product shall be made available only through an approved treatment authorization request pursuant to subdivision (i).

(h) For a drug product added to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs pursuant to Section 14105.43 or 14133.2 on or after January 1, 2026, a pharmaceutical manufacturer shall provide to the department a state rebate pursuant to
 subdivision (e). If the pharmaceutical manufacturer does not enter into a supplemental rebate agreement within 60 days after the addition of the drug to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs, the manufacturer shall provide to the department a state rebate equal to not less than 25 percent of the average manufacturer price based on Medi-Cal utilization data for any drug products that have been added to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs pursuant to Section 14105.43 or 14133.2. If the pharmaceutical manufacturer does not enter into a supplemental rebate agreement within 120 days after the addition of the drug to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs, the pharmaceutical manufacturer’s drug product shall be made available only through an approved treatment authorization request pursuant to subdivision (i). For supplemental rebate agreements executed more than 120 days after the addition of the drug product to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs, the state rebate shall equal an amount not less than 25 percent of the
 average manufacturer price based on Medi-Cal utilization data for any drug products that have been added to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs pursuant to Section 14105.43 or 14133.2.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, drug products added to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs pursuant to Section 14105.43 or 14133.2 of manufacturers who do not execute an agreement to pay additional rebates pursuant to this section shall be available only through an approved treatment authorization request.

(j) Changes made to the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs under this section shall be exempt from the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and shall not be subject to the review and approval
 of the Office of Administrative Law.

(k) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 96) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 97.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.44.

(a) The department shall establish an expedited review process to examine the effectiveness of investigational drugs and investigational services, and their eligibility for Medi-Cal reimbursement.

(b) The department shall adopt emergency regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code to implement subdivision (a). The adoption of the regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health or safety.
 Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted by the department in order to implement subdivision (b) shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. These regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1470, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.45.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Actual acquisition cost” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 447.502 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The actual acquisition cost shall not be considered confidential and shall be subject to disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) “Average manufacturers price” means the price reported to the department by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to Section 1927 of the Social Security
 Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8).

(3) “Average wholesale price” means the price for a drug product listed as the average wholesale price in the department’s primary price reference source.

(4) “Blood factors” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 14105.86.

(5) “Federal upper limit” means the maximum per unit reimbursement when established by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(6) “Generically equivalent drugs” means drug products with the same active chemical ingredients of the same strength and dosage form, and of the same generic drug name, as determined by the United States Adopted Names (USAN) Council and accepted
 by the federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA), as those drug products having the same chemical ingredients.

(7) “Legend drug” means any drug whose labeling states “Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription,” “Rx only,” or words of similar import.

(8) “Maximum allowable ingredient cost” (MAIC) means the maximum amount the department will reimburse Medi-Cal pharmacy providers for generically equivalent drugs.

(9) “Innovator multiple source drug,” “noninnovator multiple source drug,” and “single source drug” have the same meaning as those terms are defined in Section 1396r-8(k)(7) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(10) “Nonlegend
 drug” means any drug whose labeling does not contain the statement referenced in paragraph (7).

(11) “Pharmacy warehouse” means a physical location licensed as a wholesaler for prescription drugs that acts as a central warehouse and performs intracompany sales or transfers of those drugs to a group of pharmacies under common ownership and control.

(12) “Professional dispensing fee” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 447.502 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(13) “Specialty drugs” means drugs determined by the department pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14105.3 to generally require special handling, complex dosing regimens, specialized self-administration at home by a
 beneficiary or caregiver, or specialized nursing facility services, or may include extended patient education, counseling, monitoring, or clinical support.

(14) “Volume weighted average” means the aggregated average volume for a group of legend or nonlegend drugs, weighted by each drug’s percentage of the group’s total volume in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service program during the previous six months. For purposes of this paragraph, volume is based on the standard billing unit used for the legend or nonlegend drugs.

(15) “Wholesaler” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 4043 of the Business and Professions Code.

(16) “Wholesaler acquisition cost” means the price for a drug product listed as the
 wholesaler acquisition cost in the department’s primary price reference source.

(b) (1) Reimbursement to Medi-Cal pharmacy providers for legend and nonlegend drugs shall not exceed the lowest of either of the following:

(A) The drug ingredient cost plus a professional dispensing fee.

(B) The pharmacy’s usual and customary charge as defined in Section 14105.455.

(2) (A) Effective for dates of service on or before March 31, 2017, the professional dispensing fee shall be seven dollars and twenty-five cents ($7.25) per dispensed prescription, and the professional dispensing fee for legend drugs dispensed to a beneficiary
 residing in a skilled nursing facility or intermediate care facility shall be eight dollars ($8) per dispensed prescription. For purposes of this paragraph, “skilled nursing facility” and “intermediate care facility” have the same meaning as those terms are defined in Division 5 (commencing with Section 70001) of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Effective for dates of service on or after April 1, 2017, the professional dispensing fee shall be based upon a pharmacy’s total, both Medicaid and non-Medicaid, annual claim volume of the previous year as follows:

(i) Less than 90,000 claims per year, the professional dispensing fee shall be thirteen dollars and twenty cents ($13.20).

(ii) Ninety thousand or
 more claims per year, the professional dispensing fee shall be ten dollars and five cents ($10.05).

(C) If the department determines that a change in the amount of the professional dispensing fee is necessary pursuant to this section in order to meet federal Medicaid requirements, the department shall establish a new professional dispensing fee through the state budget process.

(i) When establishing the new professional dispensing fee or fees, the department shall establish the professional dispensing fee or fees consistent with Section 447.518(d) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(ii) The department shall consult with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders in implementing this subparagraph.

(3) The department shall establish the drug ingredient cost of legend and nonlegend drugs as follows:

(A) Effective for dates of service on or before March 31, 2017, the drug ingredient cost shall be equal to the lowest of the average wholesale price minus 17 percent, the actual acquisition cost, the federal upper limit, or the MAIC.

(B) Effective for dates of service on or after April 1, 2017, the drug ingredient cost shall be equal to the lowest of the actual acquisition cost, the federal upper limit, or the MAIC.

(C) For blood factors, the drug ingredient cost shall be established pursuant to Section 14105.86.

(D) Average wholesale price shall not be used to establish the drug ingredient cost once the department has determined that the actual acquisition cost methodology has been fully implemented.

(4) For purposes of paragraph (3), the department may establish a list of MAICs for generically equivalent drugs. If the department establishes a list of MAICs for generically equivalent drugs, the department shall update the list of MAICs and establish additional MAICs in accordance with all of the following:

(A) The department shall establish a MAIC only when three or more generically equivalent drugs are available for purchase and dispensing by retail pharmacies in California.

(B) The department shall base the MAIC on
 the mean of the average manufacturer’s price of drugs generically equivalent to the particular innovator drug plus a percent markup determined by the department to be necessary for the MAIC to represent the average purchase price paid by retail pharmacies in California.

(C) If average manufacturer prices are unavailable, the department shall establish the MAIC in one of the following ways:

(i) Based on the volume weighted average of wholesaler acquisition costs of drugs generically equivalent to the particular innovator drug plus a percent markup determined by the department to be necessary for the MAIC to represent the average purchase price paid by retail pharmacies in California.

(ii) Pursuant to a contract with a vendor for
 the purpose of surveying drug price information, collecting data, and calculating a proposed MAIC.

(iii) Based on the volume weighted actual acquisition cost of drugs generically equivalent to the particular innovator drug adjusted by the department to represent the average purchase price paid by Medi-Cal pharmacy providers.

(D) The department shall publish the list of MAICs in pharmacy provider bulletins and manuals, update the MAICs at least annually, and notify Medi-Cal providers at least 30 days prior to the effective date of a MAIC.

(E) The department shall establish a process for providers to seek a change to a specific MAIC when the providers believe the MAIC does not reflect current available market prices.
 If the department determines a MAIC change is warranted, the department may update a specific MAIC prior to notifying providers.

(F) In determining the average purchase price, the department shall consider the provider-related costs of the products that include, but are not limited to, shipping, handling, and storage. Costs of the provider that are included in the costs of the dispensing shall not be used to determine the average purchase price.

(5) (A) The department may establish the actual acquisition cost in one of the following ways:

(i) Based on the volume weighted actual acquisition cost adjusted by the department to verify that the actual acquisition cost represents the average
 purchase price paid by retail pharmacies in California.

(ii) Based on the proposed actual acquisition cost as calculated by the vendor pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(iii) Based on a national pricing benchmark obtained from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or on a similar benchmark listed in the department’s primary price reference source adjusted by the department to verify that the actual acquisition cost represents the average purchase price paid by retail pharmacies in California.

(B) For the purposes of paragraph (3), the department may contract with a vendor for the purposes of surveying drug price information, collecting data from providers, wholesalers, or drug manufacturers, and
 calculating a proposed actual acquisition cost.

(C) (i) Medi-Cal pharmacy providers shall submit drug price information to the department or a vendor designated by the department for the purposes of establishing the actual acquisition cost. The information submitted by pharmacy providers shall include, but not be limited to, invoice prices and all discounts, rebates, and refunds known to the provider that would apply to the acquisition cost of the drug products purchased during the calendar quarter. Pharmacy warehouses shall be exempt from the survey process, but shall provide drug cost information upon audit by the department for the purposes of validating individual pharmacy provider acquisition costs.

(ii) Pharmacy providers that fail to submit drug price
 information
 to the department or the vendor as required by this subparagraph shall receive notice that if they do not provide the required information within five working days, they shall be subject to suspension under subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 14123.

(D) (i) For new drugs or new formulations of existing drugs, if drug price information is unavailable pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (C), drug manufacturers and wholesalers shall submit drug price information to the department or a vendor designated by the department for the purposes of establishing the actual acquisition cost. Drug price information shall include, but not be limited to, net unit sales of a drug product sold to retail pharmacies in California divided by the total number of units of the drug sold by the manufacturer or wholesaler in a
 specified period of time determined by the department.

(ii) Drug products from manufacturers and wholesalers that fail to submit drug price information to the department or the vendor as required by this subparagraph shall not be a reimbursable benefit of the Medi-Cal program for those manufacturers and wholesalers until the department has established the actual acquisition cost for those drug products.

(E) Drug pricing information provided to the department or a vendor designated by the department for the purposes of establishing the actual acquisition cost pursuant to this section shall be confidential and shall be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(F) Prior to the implementation of an actual acquisition cost methodology, the department shall collect data through a survey of pharmacy providers for purposes of establishing a professional dispensing fee or fees in compliance with federal Medicaid requirements.

(i) The department shall seek stakeholder input on the retail pharmacy factors and elements used for the pharmacy survey relative to both actual acquisition costs and professional dispensing costs.

(ii) For drug products provided by pharmacy providers pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14105.3, a differential professional fee or payment for services to provide specialized care may be considered as part of the contracts established pursuant to that section.

(G) When the department implements the actual acquisition cost methodology, the department shall update the Medi-Cal claims processing system to reflect the actual acquisition cost of drugs not later than 30 days after the department has established actual acquisition cost pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(H) Notwithstanding any other law, if the department implements actual acquisition cost pursuant to clause (i) or (ii) of subparagraph (A), the department shall update actual acquisition costs at least every three months and notify Medi-Cal providers at least 30 days prior to the effective date of any change in an actual acquisition cost.

(I) The department shall make available a process for providers to seek a change
 to a specific actual acquisition cost when the providers believe the actual acquisition cost does not reflect current available market prices. If the department determines an actual acquisition cost change is warranted, the department may update a specific actual acquisition cost prior to notifying providers.

(c) The director shall implement this section in a manner that is consistent with federal Medicaid law and regulations. The director shall seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal approval is obtained.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific
 this section by means of a provider bulletin or notice, policy letter, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(e) The department may enter into contracts with a vendor for the purposes of implementing this section on a bid or nonbid basis. In order to achieve maximum cost savings, the Legislature declares that an expedited process for contracts under this section is necessary. Therefore, contracts entered into to implement this section, and all contract amendments and change orders, shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(f) (1) The rates provided for in this section shall be implemented only if the director determines that the rates will comply with
 applicable federal Medicaid requirements and that federal financial participation will be available.

(2) In determining whether federal financial participation is available, the director shall determine whether the rates comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements, including those set forth in Section 1396a(a)(30)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) To the extent that the director determines that the rates do not comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements or that federal financial participation is not available with respect to any rate of reimbursement described in this section, the director retains the discretion not to implement that rate and may revise the rate as necessary to comply with federal Medicaid requirements.

(g) The director shall seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section.

(h) This section shall not be construed to require the department to collect cost data, to conduct cost studies, or to set or adjust a rate of reimbursement based on cost data that has been collected.

(i) Effective for dates of service on or after April 1, 2017, adjustments to pharmacy drug product payments pursuant to Section 14105.192 shall no longer apply.

(j) Prior to implementation of this section, the department shall provide the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature with information on the department’s plan for implementation of the
 actual acquisition cost methodology pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 450.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.451.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) The United States Department of Health and Human Services has identified the critical need for state Medicaid agencies to establish pharmacy reimbursement rates based on a pricing benchmark that reflects actual acquisition costs.

(B) The Medi-Cal program currently uses a methodology based on average wholesale price (AWP).

(C) Investigations by the federal Office of Inspector General have found that average wholesale price is inflated relative to average acquisition cost.

(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation by August 1, 2011, that provides for development of a new reimbursement methodology that will enable the department to achieve savings while continuing to reimburse pharmacy providers in compliance with federal law.

(b) Subject to Section 14105.45, the department may require providers, manufacturers, and wholesalers to submit any data the director determines necessary or useful in preparing for the transition from a methodology based on average
 wholesale price to a methodology based on actual acquisition cost.

(c) If the AWP ceases to be listed by the department’s primary price reference source vendor, the department may direct the fiscal intermediary to establish a process with the primary price reference source vendor to temporarily report the AWP consistent with the definition of AWP in Section 14105.45. If this process is established, it shall be limited in scope and duration, and shall cease when the department has fully implemented the average acquisition cost methodology pursuant to Section 14105.45.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 29, Sec. 15.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.455.

(a) Pharmacy providers shall submit their usual and customary charge when billing the Medi-Cal program for prescribed drugs.

(b) “Usual and customary charge” means the lower of the following:

(1) The lowest price reimbursed to the pharmacy by other third-party payers in
 California, excluding Medi-Cal managed care plans and Medicare Part D prescription drug plans.

(2) The lowest price routinely offered to any segment of the general public.

(c) Donations or discounts provided to a charitable organization are not considered usual and customary charges.

(d) Pharmacy providers shall keep and maintain records of their usual and customary charges for a period of three years from the date the service was rendered.

(e) Payment to pharmacy providers shall be the lower of the pharmacy’s usual and customary charge or the reimbursement rate pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14105.45.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of a provider bulletin or notice, policy letter, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 29, Sec. 16.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.456.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Blood factors” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 14105.86.

(2) “Generically equivalent drugs” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 14105.45.

(3) “Legend drug” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 14105.45.

(4) “Medicare rate” means the rate of reimbursement established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the Medicare Program.

(5) “Nonlegend drug” has the
 same meaning as that term is defined in Section 14105.45.

(6) “Pharmacy rate of reimbursement” means the reimbursement to a Medi-Cal pharmacy provider pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14105.45.

(7) “Physician-administered drug” means any legend drug, nonlegend drug, or vaccine administered or dispensed to a beneficiary by a Medi-Cal provider other than a pharmacy provider and billed to the department on a fee-for-service basis.

(8) “Volume-weighted average” means the aggregated average volume for generically equivalent drugs, weighted by each drug’s percentage of the total volume in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service program during the previous six months. For purposes of this paragraph, volume is based on the standard billing unit used for the generically equivalent drugs.

(b) The department may reimburse providers for a physician-administered drug using either a Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System code or a National Drug Code.

(c) The Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System code rate of reimbursement for a physician-administered drug shall be equal to the volume-weighted average of the pharmacy rate of reimbursement for generically equivalent drugs. The department shall publish the Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System code rates of reimbursement.

(d) The National Drug Code rate of reimbursement shall equal the pharmacy rate of reimbursement.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (c) and (d), the department may reimburse providers for physician-administered drugs, with the exception of blood factors, at a rate not
 less than the Medicare rate.

(f) Physician-administered drugs that are blood factors shall be reimbursed pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 14105.86.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of a provider bulletin or notice, policy letter, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(h) (1) The rates provided for in this section shall be implemented commencing January 1, 2011, but only if the director determines that the rates comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements and that federal financial participation will be available.

(2) In assessing
 whether federal financial participation is available, the director shall determine whether the rates comply with the federal Medicaid requirements, including those set forth in Section 1396a(a)(30)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code. To the extent that the director determines that a rate of reimbursement described in this section does not comply with the federal Medicaid requirements, the director retains the discretion not to implement that rate and may revise the rate as necessary to comply with the federal Medicaid requirements.

(i) The director shall seek any necessary federal approval for the implementation of this section. To the extent that federal financial participation is not available with respect to a rate of reimbursement described in this section, the director retains the discretion not to implement that rate and may revise the rate as necessary to comply with the federal Medicaid
 requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 52, Sec. 28.   (SB 97)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.46.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Covered entity” means a provider defined as a covered entity in Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) “340B” means the discount drug purchasing program described in Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) A covered entity shall dispense only 340B drugs to Medi-Cal
 beneficiaries.

(c) If a covered entity is unable to purchase a specific 340B drug, the covered entity may dispense a drug purchased at regular drug wholesale rates to a Medi-Cal beneficiary. If a covered entity dispenses a drug purchased at regular drug wholesale rates pursuant to this subdivision, the covered entity is required to maintain documentation of their inability to obtain the 340B drug.

(d) A covered entity shall bill an amount not to exceed the entity’s actual acquisition cost for the drug, as charged by the manufacturer at a price consistent with Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code plus the professional fee pursuant to Section 14105.45 or the dispensing fee pursuant to Section 14132.01.

(e) A covered entity shall identify a 340B drug on the claim submitted to the Medi-Cal program for
 reimbursement.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may take the actions specified in this section by means of a provider bulletin or notice, policy letter, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 40.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.467.

(a) The department shall establish, implement, and maintain a supplemental payment pool for nonhospital 340B community clinics, subject to an appropriation by the Legislature.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2021, and any subsequent fiscal year to the extent funds are appropriated by the Legislature for the purpose described in this section, the department shall make available fee-for-service-based supplemental payments from a fixed-amount payment pool to qualifying nonhospital 340B community clinics in accordance with this section and any terms of federal approval obtained pursuant to subdivision (f).

(c) (1) On or before July 15, 2020, the department shall establish a stakeholder
 process, which shall include representatives of qualifying nonhospital 340B community clinics. Representatives shall be geographically diverse and consist of qualifying nonhospital 340B community clinics with differing pharmacy arrangements, including those that operate in-house pharmacies and those with contract pharmacy arrangements. The stakeholder process shall be utilized to develop and implement the methodology for distribution of supplemental pool payments to qualifying nonhospital 340B community clinics. This shall include the eligibility criteria for receipt of supplemental payments, the aggregate amount of pool funding available in a respective fiscal year, the criteria for apportioning the pool funding among qualifying nonhospital 340B community clinics, and the timing, frequency, and amount of the resultant supplemental payments.

(2) The department shall conduct at least three meetings with stakeholders and shall finalize the
 methodology for distribution no later than October 1, 2020.

(d) (1) For any fiscal year that the department implements this section, the aggregate amount of supplemental payments available shall not exceed the pool amount established by the department for the respective fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) For any fiscal year that the department implements this section, the supplemental payment amounts received by a qualifying nonhospital 340B community clinic shall not exceed the apportioned amounts of the pool funding attributable to that individual clinic under the methodology developed pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) To the extent permissible under federal law, supplemental payments received by qualifying nonhospital 340B community clinics pursuant to this section shall be
 considered separate and apart from the prospective payment system (PPS) reimbursement the clinic receives pursuant to Section 1396a(bb) of Title 42 of the United States Code and shall not be considered during annual reconciliation of the PPS rate.

(f) (1) The department may modify any methodology or other requirement specified in this section to the extent it deems necessary to meet the requirements of federal law or regulations, to obtain or maintain federal approval, or to ensure federal financial participation is available or not otherwise jeopardized.
